tr: Elektronik > Ağ Sistemleri > Köprüler ve Yönlendiriciler: Mobil Yönlendiriciler; Mesh WiFi Sistemleri; Ağ Köprüleri; VoIP Ağ Geçitleri ve Yönlendiricileri; Kablolu Yönlendiriciler; Kablosuz Erişim Noktaları; Kablosuz Yönlendiriciler
cs: Elektronika > Sítě > Síťové mosty a routery: Mobilní routery; Síťové WiFi systémy; Síťové mosty; Směrovače a brány VoIP; Drátové routery; Bezdrátové přístupové body; Bezdrátové routery
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ระบบเครือข่าย > บริดจ์และเราเตอร์: เราเตอร์เซลลูลาร์; ระบบไวไฟเมช; บริดจ์เครือข่าย; เกตเวย์และเราเตอร์ VoIP; เราเตอร์แบบสายเคเบิล; จุดการเชื่อมต่อแบบไร้สาย; เราเตอร์แบบไร้สาย
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 网络 > 网桥与路由器: 蜂窝路由器; Mesh 无线网络系统; 网桥; VoIP 网关与路由器; 有线路由器; 无线网络接入点; 无线路由器
ru: Электроника > Сетевое оборудование > Мосты и маршрутизаторы: Сотовые маршрутизаторы; Mesh-системы Wi-Fi; Сетевые мосты; VoIP-шлюзы и маршрутизаторы; Проводные маршрутизаторы; Точки беспроводного доступа; Беспроводные маршрутизаторы
de: Elektronik > Netzwerktechnik > Bridges & Router: Mobilfunk-Router; Mesh-Wi-Fi-Systeme; Netzwerk-Bridges; VoIP-Gateways & -Router; Kabelgebundene Router; Wireless Access Points; Wireless Router
pl: Elektronika > Sieci > Mostki i routery: Routery komórkowe; Systemy WiFi Mesh; Mostki sieciowe; Bramki i routery VoIP; Routery przewodowe; Bezprzewodowe punkty dostępowe; Routery bezprzewodowe
ko: 전자기기 > 네트워킹 > 브리지/라우터: 셀룰러 라우터; 메시 Wi-Fi 시스템; 네트워크 브리지; VoIP 게이트웨이/라우터; 유선 라우터; 무선 액세스 포인트; 무선 라우터
fi: Elektroniikka > Verkkojen toteutus > Sillat ja reitittimet: Matkapuhelinreititin; Mesh WiFi -järjestelmä; Verkkosillat; VoIP-yhdyskäytävät ja reitittimet; Langallinen reititin; Langattomat liitäntäpisteet; Langattomat reitittimet
fr: Appareil électronique > Réseaux > Ponts et routeurs: Routeurs 4G/5G; Systèmes Wi-Fi maillés; Ponts réseau; Passerelles et routeurs VoIP; Routeurs filaires; Points d’accès Wi-Fi; Routeurs Wi-Fi
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Ligação em rede > Pontes e routers: Routers celulares; Sistemas WiFi mesh; Pontes de rede; Gateways VoIP e routers; Routers com fios; Pontos de acesso sem fios; Routers sem fios
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Rede > Pontes e roteadores: Roteadores celulares; Sistemas WiFi mesh; Ponte de rede; Gateways e roteadores para VoIP; Roteadores com fio; Pontos de acesso sem fio; Roteadores sem fio
sl-SI: Elektronika > Mreženje > Mostovi in usmerjevalniki: Mobilni usmerjevalniki; Mesh Wi‑Fi sistemi; Omrežni mostovi; Vrata in usmerjevalniki VoIP; Žični usmerjevalniki; Brezžične dostopne točke; Brezžični usmerjevalniki
es: Electrónica > Redes > Puentes y enrutadores: Routers celulares; Sistemas WiFi de malla; Puentes de red; Enrutadores y puertas de enlace VoIP; Routers cableados; Puntos de acceso inalámbrico; Enrutadores inalámbricos
da: Elektronik > Netværk > Broer og routere: Mobilroutere; Mesh-Wi-Fi-systemer; Netværksbroer; VoIP-gateways og -routere; Kablede routere; Trådløse adgangspunkter; Trådløse routere
sk-SK: Elektronika > Siete > Mosty a smerovače: Mobilné routery; Mesh Wi‑Fi systémy; Sieťové mosty; VoIP brány a smerovače; Káblové routery; Bezdrôtové prístupové body; Bezdrôtové smerovače
sv: Elektronik > Nätverk > Bryggor och routrar: Mobilroutrar; Mesh Wi‑Fi-system; Nätverksbryggor; VoIP-gateways och routers; Trådbundna routrar; Trådlösa åtkomstpunkter; Trådlösa routrar
hr-HR: Elektronika > Umrežavanje > Mostovi i ruteri: Mobilni routeri; Mesh Wi-Fi sustav; Mrežni mostovi; VoIP pristupnici i ruteri; Žični router; Bežične pristupne točke; Bežični ruteri
nb: Elektronikk > Nettverk > Broer og rutere: Mobilrutere; Mesh wifi-systemer; Nettverksbroer; VoIP-gatewayer og rutere; Kablede rutere; Trådløse tilgangspunkter; Trådløse rutere
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Δικτύωση > Γέφυρες & δρομολογητές δικτύου: Δρομολογητές κινητής τηλεφωνίας; Συστήματα Mesh WiFi; Γέφυρες δικτύου; Πύλες & δρομολογητές VoIP (μετάδοσης φωνής μέσω πρωτοκόλλου Διαδικτύου); Ενσύρματοι δρομολογητές; Σημεία ασύρματης πρόσβασης; Ασύρματοι δρομολογητές
it: Elettronica > Rete > Bridge e router: Router cellulari; Sistemi WiFi mesh; Bridge di rete; Gateway e router VoIP; Router cablati; WAP (Wireless Access Point); Router wireless
lt-LT: Elektronika > Tinklai > Tinklų tiltai ir maršrutizatoriai: Mobilieji maršrutizatoriai; Tinklinės Wi‑Fi sistemos; Tinklų tiltai; VoIP šliuzai ir maršrutizatoriai; Laidiniai maršrutizatoriai; Belaidžiai prieigos taškai; Belaidžiai maršrutizatoriai
hu: Elektronika > Hálózatépítés > Hidak és útválasztók: Mobilhálózati útválasztók; Mesh WiFi-rendszerek; Hálózati hidak; VoIP átjárók és útválasztók; Vezetékes útválasztók; Vezeték nélküli hozzáférési pontok; Vezeték nélküli útválasztók
ja: 電子機器 > ネットワーク > ブリッジ・ルーター: LTE/5Gルーター; メッシュWi‑Fiシステム; ネットワークブリッジ; VoIPゲートウェイ・ルーター; 有線ルーター; 無線アクセスポイント; 無線ルーター
ro-RO: Electronice > Rețele > Dispozitive bridge și routere: Routere celulare; Sisteme WiFi mesh; Dispozitive bridge pentru rețea; Gateway-uri și routere VoIP; Routere cu fir; Puncte de acces wireless; Routere wireless
nl: Elektronica > Netwerken > Bridges en routers: Mobiele routers; Mesh-wifisystemen; Netwerkbridges; VoIP gateways en routers; Bekabelde routers; Draadloze toegangspunten; Draadloze routers
bg-BG: Електроника > Мрежово оборудване > Мостове и рутери: Мобилни рутери; Mesh WiFi системи; Мрежови мостове; VoIP устройства и рутери; Кабелни рутери; Безжични точки за достъп; Безжични рутери
en: Electronics > Networking > Bridges & Routers: Cellular Routers; Mesh WiFi Systems; Network Bridges; VoIP Gateways & Routers; Wired Routers; Wireless Access Points; Wireless Routers
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Nối mạng > Cầu nối & Bộ định tuyến: Bộ định tuyến di động; Hệ thống Wi-Fi lưới; Cầu mạng; Thiết bị chuyển đổi tín hiệu VoIP và bộ định tuyến; Bộ định tuyến có dây; Điểm truy cập không dây; Bộ định tuyến không dây
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 網路 > 橋接器/路由器: 行動路由器; 網格 WiFi 系統; 網路橋接器; VoIP 閘道和路由器; 有線路由器; 無線基地台; 無線路由器